Florida, session 2026, SB268.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âParagraph (l) is added to subsection (5) of 26 section 119.071, Florida Statutes, to read: 27 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 28 public records.â 29 (5)âOTHER PERSONAL INFORMATION.â 30 (l)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term âemergency 31 department physicianâ means a physician licensed under chapter 32 458 or chapter 459 whose duties are performed in a hospital 33 emergency department licensed under chapter 395. 34 2.âThe home addresses, personal telephone numbers, and 35 dates of birth of current emergency department physicians; the 36 names, home addresses, personal telephone numbers, dates of 37 birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children 38 younger than 26 years of age of such emergency department 39 physicians; and the names and locations of schools and day care 40 facilities attended by the children younger than 26 years of age 41 of such emergency department physicians are exempt from s. 42 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 43 3.âThe exemption in subparagraph 2. applies to information 44 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the 45 exemption. 46 4.âAn agency that is the custodian of information specified 47 in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the emergency 48 department physician must maintain the exempt status of that 49 information only if the individual requests the maintenance of 50 an exemption under subparagraph 2. on the basis of eligibility 51 as a current emergency department physician or the spouse or 52 child of such emergency department physician and the individual 53 submits a written and notarized request for maintenance of the 54 exemption to the custodial agency. The request must state under 55 oath the statutory basis for the individualâs exemption request 56 and confirm the individualâs eligibility for the exemption. An 57 individual who has submitted such a request has a duty to 58 withdraw the request if the exemption no longer applies to the 59 individual. If a custodial agency receives a request meeting the 60 requirements of this subparagraph, the custodial agency must 61 maintain the exempt status of such information applicable to the 62 individual until the qualifying conditions for the exemption 63 under subparagraph 2. no longer apply to the individual subject 64 to the exemption. 65 5.âThis paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset 66 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 67 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 68 through reenactment by the Legislature. 69 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 70 necessity that the home addresses, personal telephone numbers, 71 and dates of birth of current emergency department physicians; 72 the names, home addresses, personal telephone numbers, and 73 places of employment of the spouses and children younger than 26 74 years of age of such emergency department physicians; and the 75 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 76 by the children younger than 26 years of age of such emergency 77 department physicians be made exempt from public records 78 requirements. Emergency department physicians, by the nature of 79 their duties, are often placed in traumatic circumstances in 80 which loss of life and severe bodily injuries have occurred. 81 Such emergency department physicians are particularly vulnerable 82 to physical violence, harassment, and intimidation perpetrated 83 by patients or relatives of patients who can be violent, angry, 84 or mentally unstable. As a result, the Legislature finds that 85 the release of personal identifying and location information of 86 emergency department physicians, or of the spouses and children 87 of such emergency department physicians, could place them in 88 danger of being physically or emotionally harmed or stalked by a 89 person who has a hostile reaction to his or her encounter with 90 such physicians. The Legislature further finds that the harm 91 that may result from the release of such personal identifying 92 and location information outweighs any public benefit that may 93 be derived from the disclosure of the information. 94 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.